District of Columbia statutes.
2-1210.03

Capital Access Program establishment.

(a)

There is established the Capital Access Program, to be administered by the Mayor, to assist financial institutions in making loans to businesses and nonprofit organizations that face barriers in accessing capital.

(b)

The Mayor shall determine the eligibility of a financial institution to participate in the program and, by rule, may set a limit on the number of financial institutions that may participate in the program.

History

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-322, § 4, 57 DCR 12442

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4 of Capital Access Program Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-598, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11018).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4 of Capital Access Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-6, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1408).